Louisiana, session 2026, HB369.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:312(5)(b)(i) and 312.1(E)(2) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§312. Courts of appeal; circuits and districts
There shall be five court of appeal circuits, which shall be subdivided into
districts as follows:
* * *
5.
* * *
(b) Districts of the fifth circuit.
(i) The parish of Jefferson shall compose the first district of the fifth circuit.
The first district shall be further divided into two three election sections. Election
section one shall consist of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16,
17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39,
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-939 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 369
40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63, 64, 65, 66,
67, 68, 69, 70, 71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85, 86, 87, 88, 89,
90, 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, 101, 102, 103, 105, 106, 107, 116, 117,
118, 119, 120, 121, 122, 123, 124, 125, 126, 127, 128, 129, 130, 131, 132, 133, 134,
136, 138, 152, 155, 157A, 170, 171, 172, 174, 175, 176, 177, 178, 179-A, 182, 183,
184, 185A, 185B, 189, 190, 191, 192, 193, 194, 195, 196, 197A, 197B, 197C, 198,
199, 202, 203, 204, 205, 210, 211, 212A, 212B, 213A, 213B, 213C, 214A, 214B,
215, 216, 217, 225, 226, 227, 228, 229, 230, 231, 232, 233, 234, 235, 236, 237, 238,
246, 247, 248, 249, 1-G, 2-G, 3-G, 4-G, 5-G, 6-G, 7-G, 8-G, 9-G, 10-G, 11-G, 1-GI,
1-H, 2-H, 3-H, 4-H, 5-H, 6-H, 7-H, 8-H, 9-H, 13-KA, 1-K, 2-K, 3-K, 4-K, 5-K, 6-K,
7-K, 8-K, 9-K, 10-K, 11-K, 12-K, 14-K, 15-K, 16-K, 17-K,18-K, 19-K, 20-K, 25-K,
27-K, 28-K, 29-K, 30-K, 34-K, 35-K, 1-L, 1-W, 3-W, 4-W, 5-W, 6-W, and 7-W of
Jefferson Parish. Election section two shall consist of Precincts 104, 108, 115, 150,
151, 153, 154,156, 157B, 179B, 180, 181, 187, 188, 200, 201, 13-KB, 21-K, 22-K,
23-K, 24-K, 26-K, 31-K, 33-K, 173 and 2-W.
(aa) Election section one is composed of Precincts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, 10,
11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33,
34, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39, 40, 41, 42, 43, 44, 45, 46, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60,
61, 62, 63, 64, 65, 66, 68, 69, 70, 71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84,
85, 86, 87, 88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, 101, 102, 103, 105, 106,
116, 117, 118, 119, 120, 121, 122, 123, 124, 125A, 125B, 126, 127, 128, 129, 130,
131, 132, 133, 134, 136, 138, 152, 155, 157A, 170, 171, 172, 174, 175, 176, 177,
178, 179A, 182, 183, 185A, 189, 190, 191, 192, 193A, 193B, 198, 199, 202, 203,
210, 211, 225, 226, 227, 228, 229, 230, 231, 232A, 232B, 234, 235, 236, 237, 238A,
238B, 246, 247, 248, 1-G, 2-G, 3-G, 4-G, 5-G, 6-G, 7-G, 8-G, 9-G, 10-G, 11-G,
12-G, 13-G, 1-GI, 1-H, 2-H, 3-H, 4-H, 6-H, 7-H, 8-H, 9-H, 1-K, 2-K, 3-K, 4-K, 5-K,
6-KA, 6-KB, 7-KA, 7-KB, 8-K, 9-K, 10-K, 11-K, 12-K, 13-KA, 14-K, 15-K, 16-K,
17-K, 19-K, 20-K, 25-K, 27-K, 28-K, 29-K, 30-K, 34-K, 35-K, 1-L, 1-W, 3-W, 4-W,
5-W, 6-W, and 7-W of Jefferson Parish.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-939 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 369
(bb) Election section two is composed of Precincts 104, 108, 115, 150A,
150B, 151, 153, 154, 156, 173, 179B, 180, 181, 187, 188, 200, 201, 13-KB, 21-K,
22-K, 23-K, 24-K, 26-K, 31-K, and 33-K of Jefferson Parish.
(cc) Election section three is composed of Precincts 184, 185B, 194A, 194B,
195, 196, 197A, 197B, 204, 205, 212, 213A, 213B, 213C, 214A, 214B, 215, 216A,
216B, and 217 of Jefferson Parish.
* * *
§312.1. Circuit court of appeal; domicile; number of judges; election
* * *
E.
* * *
(2)(a) Six judges shall be elected from the first district of the fifth circuit by
the qualified electors thereof in the manner provided for in this Paragraph.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph:
(i) (a) The first vacancy created by the death, resignation, retirement, or
removal of a judge of the first district who was elected by the qualified electors of
election section one occurring after August 15, 2007, the effective date of the Act
that originated as House Bill No. of the 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature
shall be filled by election from election section two three of the first district and such
judgeship shall be assigned to election section two three of the first district for
election purposes thereafter. However, if no election has occurred or is scheduled
to occur to fill a vacancy in such a judgeship from election section two three prior
to the opening of qualifying for the regular statewide elections in 2012 2030, the
regular election to fill the judgeship designated as Division G B of the first district
shall be held in election section two three of the first district and such division shall
be assigned to election section two three for election purposes thereafter.
(ii) (b) At the time a judgeship is assigned to election section two three, the
remaining five four judgeships in the first district shall be assigned to election
section one for election purposes thereafter.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-939 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 369
(c) One judgeship shall be assigned to election section two.
* * *
Section 2.(A) The precincts referenced in this Act are those contained in the file
named "2026 Precinct Shapefiles (1-27-2026)" available on the website of the Legislature
of Louisiana on the effective date of this Section. The 2026 Precinct Shapefiles are based
upon those Voting Districts (VTDs) contained in the 2020 Census Redistricting TIGER/Line
Shapefiles for the State of Louisiana as those files have been modified and validated through
the data verification program of the Louisiana House of Representatives and the Louisiana
Senate to represent precinct changes submitted through January 27, 2026, to the Legislature
of Louisiana by parish governing authorities pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 18:532 and
532.1.
(B) When a precinct referenced in this Act has been subdivided by action of the
parish governing authority on a nongeographic basis or subdivided by action of the parish
governing authority on a geographic basis in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
18:532.1, the enumeration in this Act of the general precinct designation shall include all
nongeographic and all geographic subdivisions thereof, however such subdivisions may be
designated.
(C) The territorial limits of the districts as provided in this Act shall continue in
effect until changed by law regardless of any subsequent change made to the precincts by
the parish governing authority.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-939 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 369